Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7436
Emergency medical reasons, defined.

(1) Emergency medical reasons means the alleviation of a temporary shortage by transfers of prescription drugs between any of the following: (a) Holders of pharmacy licenses, (b) health care practitioner facilities as defined in section 71-414, (c) hospitals as defined in section 71-419, and (d) emergency medical services as defined in section 38-1207.

(2) Emergency medical reasons does not include regular and systematic sales (a) of prescription drugs to emergency medical services as defined in section 38-1207 or (b) to practitioners as defined in section 38-2838 of prescription drugs that will be used for routine office procedures.

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 9;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 157;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 82;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-7409;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 10;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1294;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 89;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 47.